Wyoming statutes. Title 33 Professions and Occupations
Article 4. Crematories

§ 33-16-401.
[Repealed.]

History:

Laws 1975, ch. 63, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 33-246.1; repealed by 2014 ch. 31, § 2, effective July 1, 2014.

Editor’s notes. —

These section, which derived from Laws 1975, ch. 63, § 1, related to crematories.

§ 33-16-402.
[Repealed.]

History:

Laws 1975, ch. 63, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 33-246.2; repealed by 2014 ch. 31, § 2, effective July 1, 2014.

§ 33-16-403.
[Repealed.]

History:

Laws 1975, ch. 63, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 33-246.3; repealed by 2014 ch. 31, § 2, effective July 1, 2014.

§ 33-16-404.
[Repealed.]

History:

Laws 1975, ch. 63, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 33-246.4; repealed by 2014 ch. 31, § 2, effective July 1, 2014.

§ 33-16-405.
[Repealed.]

History:

Laws 1975, ch. 63, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 33-246.5; repealed by 2014 ch. 31, § 2, effective July 1, 2014.

§ 33-16-406.
[Repealed.]

History:

Laws 1975, ch. 63, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 33-246.6; 1993, ch. 131, § 1; repealed by 2014 ch. 31, § 2, effective July 1, 2014.

§ 33-16-407.
[Repealed.]

History:

Laws 1975, ch. 63, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 33-246.7; repealed by 2014 ch. 31, § 2, effective July 1, 2014.

§ 33-16-408.
[Repealed.]

History:

Laws 1975, ch. 63, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 33-246.8; 1997, ch. 128, § 2; repealed by 2014 ch. 31, § 2, effective July 1, 2014.

§ 33-16-409.
[Repealed.]

History:

Laws 1975, ch. 63, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 33-246.9; repealed by 2014 ch. 31, § 2, effective July 1, 2014.